Vermont statutes. Title 30 Public Service
Subchapter 2. Distribution

§ 7511.
Distribution generally.

As directed by the Commissioner of Public Service, funds collected by the fiscal agent, and interest accruing thereon, shall be distributed as follows:
(a) (1) As directed by the Commissioner of Public Service, funds collected by the fiscal agent, and interest accruing thereon, shall be distributed as follows:

to pay costs payable to the fiscal agent under its contract with the Commissioner;

to support the Vermont telecommunications relay service in the manner provided by section 7512 of this title;

to support the Vermont Lifeline program in the manner provided by section 7513 of this title;

to support Enhanced 911 services in the manner provided by section 7514 of this title; and

to support the Connectivity Fund established in section 7516 of this title; and

for fiscal year 2016 only, any personnel or administrative costs associated with the Connectivity Initiative shall come from the Connectivity Fund, as determined by the Commissioner in consultation with the Connectivity Board.

If insufficient funds exist to support all of the purposes contained in subsection (a) of this section, the Commissioner shall allocate the available funds, giving priority in the order listed in subsection (a).

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 197

(Adj. Sess.), § 5; amended

2013, No. 190

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. June 16, 2014;

2013, No. 191

(Adj. Sess.), § 34;

2015, No. 41

, § 9.

§ 7512.
Telecommunications relay service.

The fiscal agent shall make distributions for the Vermont telecommunications relay service to the State Treasurer. The amount of the transfer shall be determined by the Commissioner of Public Service as the amount reasonably necessary to pay the costs of a contract administered by the Department of Public Service.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 197

(Adj. Sess.), § 5.

See note set out preceding § 7501 of this title.

§ 7513.
Lifeline.

The fiscal agent shall make distributions for the Vermont Lifeline program under subsection 218(c) of this title to reimburse telecommunications service providers for credits that have been granted to their customers, within annual limits approved in advance by the Public Utility Commission. The fiscal agent shall also make distributions to reimburse telecommunications companies for Lifeline program administration costs approved by the Commission.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 197

(Adj. Sess.), § 5; amended

1995, No. 99

(Adj. Sess.), § 13.

§ 7514.
Enhanced 911.

The fiscal agent shall make distributions to the State Treasurer, for deposit into the Enhanced 911 special fund, as annually directed by the General Assembly.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 197

(Adj. Sess.), § 5.

See note set out preceding § 7501 of this title.

§ 7515.
High-cost program.

The Universal Service Charge shall be used as a means of keeping basic telecommunications service affordable in all parts of this State, thereby maintaining universal service, and as a means of supporting access to broadband service in all parts of the State.

The Public Utility Commission, after review of a petition of a company holding a certificate of public good to provide telecommunications service in Vermont, and upon finding that the company meets all requirements for designation as an “eligible telecommunications carrier” as defined by the FCC, may designate the company as a Vermont-eligible telecommunications carrier (VETC).

The supported services a designated VETC must provide are voice telephony services, as defined by the FCC, and broadband Internet access, directly or through an affiliate. A VETC receiving support under this section shall use that support for capital improvements in high-cost areas, as defined in subsection (f) of this section, to build broadband capable networks.

The Commission may designate multiple VETCs for a single high-cost area, but each designated VETC shall:

offer supported services to customers at all locations throughout the high-cost area or areas for which it has been designated; and

for its voice telephone services, meet service quality standards set by the Commission.

A VETC shall receive support as defined in subsection (i) of this section from the fiscal agent of the Vermont Universal Service Fund for each telecommunications line in service or service location, whichever is greater in number, in each high-cost area it services. Such support may be made in the form of a net payment against the carrier’s liability to the Fund. If multiple VETCs are designated for a single area, then each VETC shall receive support for each line it has in service.

As used in this section, a Vermont telephone exchange is a “high-cost area” if the exchange is served by a rural telephone company, as defined by federal law, or if the exchange is designated as a rural exchange in the wholesale tariff of a regional bell operating company (RBOC), as defined by the FCC, or of a successor company to an RBOC. An exchange is not a high-cost area if the Public Utility Commission finds that the supported services are available to all locations throughout the exchange from at least two service providers.

Except as provided in subsection (h) of this section, a VETC shall provide broadband Internet access at speeds no lower than 25 Mbps download and 3 Mbps upload in each high-cost area it serves within five years of designation. A VETC need not provide broadband service to a location that has service available from another service provider, as determined by the Department of Public Service.

The Public Utility Commission may modify the buildout requirements of subsection (d) of this section as it relates to broadband Internet access to be the geographic area that could be reached using one-half of the funds to be received over five years. A VETC may seek such waiver of the buildout requirements within one year of designation and shall demonstrate the cost of meeting broadband Internet access requirements on an exchange basis and propose an alternative buildout plan.

The amount of the monthly support under this section shall be the pro rata share of available funds based on the total number of incumbent local exchange carriers in the State and reflecting each carrier’s lines in service or service locations in its high-cost area or areas, as determined under subsection (e) of this section. If an incumbent local exchange carrier does not petition the Commission for VETC designation, or is found ineligible by the Commission, the share of funds it otherwise would have received under this section shall be used to support the Connectivity Initiative established in section 7515b of this chapter.

The Public Utility Commission shall adopt by rule standards and procedures for ensuring projects funded under this section are not competitive overbuilds of existing wired telecommunications services.

Each VETC shall submit certification that it is meeting the requirements of this section and an accounting of how it expended the funds received under this section in the previous calendar year, with its annual report to the Department of Public Service. For good cause shown, the Public Utility Commission may investigate submissions required by this subsection and may revoke a company’s designation if it finds that the company is not meeting the requirements of this subsection.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 197

(Adj. Sess.), § 5; amended

2011, No. 169

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. May 18, 2012;

2013, No. 190

(Adj. Sess.), § 5, eff. June 16, 2014;

2015, No. 41

, § 11;

2019, No. 79

, § 4, eff. June 20, 2019.

§ 7515a.
Repealed. 2015, No. 41, § 8.

§ 7515b. Section 7515b effective until January 1, 2022; see also section 7515b effective January 1, 2022 set out below. Connectivity Initiative.

The purpose of the Connectivity Initiative is to provide each service location in Vermont access to broadband that is capable of speeds of at least 25 Mbps download and 3 Mbps upload. Within this category of service locations, priority shall be given first to unserved and then to underserved locations. As used in this section, “unserved” means a location that only has access to broadband capable of speeds of less than 4 Mbps download and 1 Mbps upload and “underserved” means a location that only has access to broadband capable of speeds of at least 4 Mbps download and 1 Mbps upload but less than 25 Mbps download and 3 Mbps upload.

The Department of Public Service shall publish annually a list of E-911 locations eligible for funding based on the Department’s most recent broadband mapping data. The Department annually shall solicit proposals from service providers to deploy broadband to eligible E-911 locations. Funding shall be available for capital improvements only, not for operating and maintenance expenses, and shall be available only for projects that the Department determines do not conflict with or undermine the deployment plans of a communications union district. The Department shall give priority to proposals that reflect the lowest cost of providing services to unserved and underserved locations; however, the Department also shall consider:

the proposed data transfer rates and other data transmission characteristics of services that would be available to consumers;

the price to consumers of services;

the proposed cost to consumers of any new construction, equipment installation service, or facility required to obtain service;

whether the proposal would use the best available technology that is economically feasible;

the availability of service of comparable quality and speed;

the objectives of the State’s Telecommunications Plan; and

the extent to which a proposal leverages federal or private funding opportunities.

In order to ensure that grants are disbursed based on the value of work completed, the Department shall develop with each grantee a payment schedule that reflects the verified percentage of project completion. To verify project completion, the grantee shall retain a Department-approved third party to conduct independent field testing, which the Department may supplement with provider-supplied data and crowd-sourced user data. If deemed necessary by the Department, the Department may advance a grantee funds necessary for project commencement. The Department shall retain five percent of an award for two years after project completion to ensure continued compliance with contract terms. A grantee shall reimburse the Department any funds received for contracted work that is not completed pursuant to contract specifications.

The Department shall maintain a publicly accessible inventory of completed broadband projects financed in whole or in part with grants under this section.

HISTORY:

Added

2013, No. 190

(Adj. Sess.), § 6, eff. June 16, 2014; amended

2015, No. 41

, § 12;

2017, No. 169

(Adj. Sess.), § 10;

2019, No. 79

, § 5, eff. June 20, 2019;

2021, No. 71

, § 7c, eff. June 8, 2021;

2021, No. 71

, § 7d, eff. Jan. 1, 2022.

§ 7515b. Section 7515b effective January 1, 2022; see also section 7515b effective until January 1, 2022 set out above. Connectivity Initiative.

The Connectivity Initiative shall be administered by the Vermont Community Broadband Board. The purpose of the Connectivity Initiative is to provide each service location in Vermont access to broadband that is capable of speeds of at least 100 Mbps symmetrical. Within this category of service locations, priority shall be given first to unserved and then to underserved locations that are part of a plan to achieve universal broadband coverage in a community or communications union district. As used in this section, “unserved” means a location that only has access to broadband capable of speeds of less than 4 Mbps download and 1 Mbps upload and “underserved” means a location that only has access to broadband capable of speeds of at least 4 Mbps download and 1 Mbps upload but less than 25 Mbps download and 3 Mbps upload.

The Department of Public Service shall publish annually a list of E-911 locations eligible for funding based on the Department’s most recent broadband mapping data. The Board annually shall solicit proposals from communications union districts and from service providers working in conjunction with a communications union district to provide universal broadband service in a community or communications union district, to deploy broadband to eligible E-911 locations. Funding shall be available for capital improvements only, not for operating and maintenance expenses, and shall be available only for projects that the Board determines do not conflict with or undermine the deployment plans of a communications union district. The Board shall give priority to proposals that reflect the lowest cost of providing services to unserved and underserved locations; however, the Board also shall consider:

the proposed data transfer rates and other data transmission characteristics of services that would be available to consumers;

the price to consumers of services;

the proposed cost to consumers of any new construction, equipment installation service, or facility required to obtain service;

whether the proposal would use the best available technology that is economically feasible;

the availability of service of comparable quality and speed;

the objectives of the State’s Telecommunications Plan; and

the extent to which a proposal leverages federal or private funding opportunities.

In order to ensure that grants are disbursed based on the value of work completed, the Board shall develop with each grantee a payment schedule that reflects the verified percentage of project completion. To verify project completion, the grantee shall retain a Board-approved third party to conduct independent field testing, which the Board may supplement with provider-supplied data and crowd-sourced user data. If deemed necessary by the Board, the Board may advance a grantee funds necessary for project commencement. The Board shall retain five percent of an award for two years after project completion to ensure continued compliance with contract terms. A grantee shall reimburse the Board any funds received for contracted work that is not completed pursuant to contract specifications.

The Board shall maintain a publicly accessible inventory of completed broadband projects financed in whole or in part with grants under this section.

HISTORY:

Added

2013, No. 190

(Adj. Sess.), § 6, eff. June 16, 2014; amended

2015, No. 41

, § 12;

2017, No. 169

(Adj. Sess.), § 10;

2019, No. 79

, § 5, eff. June 20, 2019;

2021, No. 71

, § 7c, eff. June 8, 2021;

2021, No. 71

, § 7d, eff. Jan. 1, 2022.

§ 7516.
Connectivity Fund.

There is created a Connectivity Fund for the purpose of providing support to the High-Cost Program established under section 7515 of this chapter and the Connectivity Initiative established under section 7515b of this chapter. The fiscal agent shall determine annually, on or before November 1, the amount of monies available to the Connectivity Fund. Such funds shall be apportioned as follows: 45 percent to the High-Cost Program and 55 percent to the Connectivity Initiative.

[Repealed.]

HISTORY:

Added

2013, No. 190

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. June 16, 2014; amended

2015, No. 41

, § 10;

2019, No. 31

, § 8;

2019, No. 79

, § 3, eff. June 20, 2019;

2021, No. 71

, § 7a, eff. June 8, 2021.